Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before April 30, 2018, the State Fire Marshal shall  issue grants to the
sheriffs’ offices of Multnomah County and Hood  River County for expenses related to wildfire
recovery, mitigation and preparedness, which may include, without limitation:
(1) Equipment and training relating to prevention, assessment and mitigation of wildfires;
(2) Equipment and training, including poles,  helmets and helmet lamps, for use in search
and rescue and other fire-related operations; and
(3) Wildfire first responder training.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Fire Marshal, for the biennium ending June 30,  2019, out of the General
Fund, the  amount of $151,000, which may be expended for the purposes described in section
1 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4152 (HB 4152-B) Page 1
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4152 (HB 4152-B) Page 2